Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4616
Testimony by electronic means.

In a proceeding under sections 43-4613 to 43-4623, a party or witness who is not reasonably available to appear personally may appear, provide testimony, and present evidence by electronic means unless the court finds good cause to require a personal appearance.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 16.